Indiana, session 2026, SB16.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-31.5-2-139.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 139.4. "Frame", for purposes of
IC 35-47-1-6.7, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-47-1-5.3.
SECTION 2. IC 35-31.5-2-246.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 246.5. "Privately made firearm",
for purposes of IC 35-47, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-47-1-6.7.
SECTION 3. IC 35-31.5-2-267.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 267.9. "Receiver", for purposes
of IC 35-47-1-6.7, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-47-1-8.5.
SECTION 4. IC 35-31.5-2-345.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 345.5. "Variant", for purposes of
IC 35-47-1-5.3 and IC 35-47-1-8.5, has the meaning set forth in
2026 IN 16—LS 6111/DI 143


IC 35-47-1-12.5.
SECTION 5. IC 35-47-1-5.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.3. For purposes of section 6.7 of this chapter,
"frame" means the part of a handgun or variant of a handgun that
provides housing or a structure for the primary energized
component designed to hold back the:
(1) hammer;
(2) striker;
(3) bolt; or
(4) component similar to the items listed in subdivisions (1)
through (3);
prior to initiation of the firing sequence, even if pins or other
attachments are required to connect the component to the housing
or structure.
SECTION 6. IC 35-47-1-6.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.7. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
"privately made firearm" means a:
(1) firearm that is completed, assembled, or otherwise
produced:
(A) by a person that does not possess a valid federal
firearms license issued under 18 U.S.C. 923; or
(B) without a serial number placed:
(i) by a person that possesses a valid federal firearms
license issued under 18 U.S.C. 923; and
(ii) at the time the firearm was completed, assembled, or
otherwise produced; or
(2) frame or receiver:
(A) that either:
(i) has been assembled or otherwise produced by a
person that does not possess a valid federal firearms
license issued under 18 U.S.C. 923; or
(ii) may be easily converted into a firearm by a person
that does not possess a valid federal firearms license
issued under 18 U.S.C. 923; or
(B) without a serial number placed:
(i) by a person that possesses a valid federal firearms
license issued under 18 U.S.C. 923; and
(ii) at the time the firearm was completed, assembled, or
otherwise produced.
(b) The term does not include a firearm that:
2026 IN 16—LS 6111/DI 143


(1) is identified and registered in the National Firearms
Registration and Transfer Record under 26 U.S.C. 53; or
(2) was manufactured or made before October 22, 1968,
unless the firearm was remanufactured after that date.
SECTION 7. IC 35-47-1-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. For purposes of section 6.7 of this chapter,
"receiver" means the part of a:
(1) rifle;
(2) shotgun;
(3) projectile weapon other than a handgun; or
(4) variant of a weapon listed in subdivisions (1) through (3);
that provides housing or a structure for the primary component
designed to block or seal the breech prior to initiation of the firing
sequence, even if pins or other attachments are required to connect
the component to the housing or structure.
SECTION 8. IC 35-47-1-12.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. For purposes of sections 5.3
and 8.5 of this chapter, "variant" means a weapon that uses a
similar frame or receiver design irrespective of new or different:
(1) model designations or configurations;
(2) characteristics;
(3) features;
(4) components;
(5) accessories; or
(6) attachments.
SECTION 9. IC 35-47-2-18, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2020,
SECTION 73, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) No person shall: A person may not:
(1) remove, obliterate, or alter:
(A) the importer or manufacturer's serial number on any
firearm; or
(B) the name of the manufacturer, model number, or
manufacturer's number; or
(C) any other mark of identification on a firearm;
(2) possess any firearm on which:
(A) the importer or manufacturer's serial number;
(B) the name of the manufacturer, model number, or
manufacturer's number; or
(C) any other mark of identification on a firearm;
has been removed, obliterated, or altered; or
2026 IN 16—LS 6111/DI 143


(3) possess a privately made firearm.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this section
commits a Level 5 felony.
2026 IN 16—LS 6111/DI 143